hr-HR: Olfaktorni umjetnički alat kompletan sadržaj: Bočice/flakoni; Digitalna vaga; Boje/koloranti; Eterična ulja; Mirisna ulja; Lijevci; Mirisni štapići / prazne jezgre; Naljepnice; Kalupi; Pipete/kapaljke; Lonac za izlijevanje / vrč za topljenje; Smole/prahovi; Mirisne trakice / bloteri; Alat za miješanje / lopatica; Termometar; Uređaj za topljenje voska / lonac za grijanje; Alati za centriranje fitilja; Naljepnice za fitilj / ljepila; Fitilji; Ostalo
pt-PT: Conteúdo do kit de ferramentas de artes olfativas: Garrafas/frascos; Balança digital; Corantes; Óleos essenciais; Óleos aromáticos; Funis; Paus de incenso/núcleos em branco; Etiquetas; Moldes; Pipetas/conta-gotas; Recipiente de despejo/jarro de fusão; Resinas/pós; Tiras olfativas/mata-borrões; Ferramenta de mistura/espátula; Termómetro; Fundidor de cera/recipiente de aquecimento; Ferramentas de centragem de pavio; Autocolantes/adesivos de pavio; Pavios; Outro
en: Olfactory arts tool kit content: Bottles/flacons; Digital scale; Dyes/colorants; Essential oils; Fragrance oils; Funnels; Incense sticks/blank cores; Labels; Molds; Pipettes/droppers; Pouring pot/melting pitcher; Resins/powders; Scent strips/blotters; Stirring tool/spatula; Thermometer; Wax melter/heating pot; Wick centering tools; Wick stickers/adhesives; Wicks; Other
de: Inhalt des Werkzeugsets für olfaktorische Kunst: Flaschen/Flakons; Digitalwaage; Farbstoffe/Färbemittel; Ätherische Öle; Duftöle; Trichter; Räucherstäbchen/Rohlinge; Etiketten; Formen; Pipetten/Tropfer; Gießtopf/Schmelztiegel; Harze/Pulver; Duftstreifen/Teststreifen; Rührwerkzeug/Spatel; Thermometer; Wachsschmelzer/Heiztopf; Dochtzentrierer; Dochtaufkleber/Klebstoffe; Dochte; Sonstige
zh-TW: 嗅覺藝術工具套件內容: 瓶子/香水瓶; 電子秤; 染料/著色劑; 精油; 香精油; 漏斗; 線香/香芯; 標籤; 模具; 滴管/滴漏; 傾倒壺/熔化壺; 樹脂/粉末; 試香紙/吸水紙; 攪拌工具/刮刀; 溫度計; 熔蠟器/加熱鍋; 燭芯居中工具; 燭芯貼紙/黏合劑; 燭芯; 其他
cs: Obsah sady nástrojů pro čichové umění: Lahvičky/flakony; Digitální váha; Barviva; Esenciální oleje; Vonné oleje; Trychtýře; Vonné tyčinky / slepá jádra; Štítky; Formy; Pipety/kapátka; Licí nádoba / tavicí konvička; Pryskyřice/prášky; Testovací proužky; Míchací nástroj / špachtle; Teploměr; Tavič vosku / zahřívací nádoba; Nástroje pro centrování knotu; Samolepky na knoty / lepidla; Knoty; Ostatní
es: Contenido del kit de herramientas para artes olfativas: Botellas/frascos; Báscula digital; Tintes/colorantes; Aceites esenciales; Aceites aromáticos; Embudos; Varitas de incienso/núcleos sin perfume; Etiquetas; Moldes; Pipetas/goteros; Jarra para verter/jarra para fundir; Resinas/polvos; Tiras olfativas/secantes; Herramienta para agitar/espátula; Termómetro; Fundidor de cera/olla de calentamiento; Herramientas de centrado de mecha; Pegatinas/adhesivos para mechas; Mechas; Otro
nb: Innhold i sett for parfymekunst: Flasker/flakonger; Digital vekt; Fargestoffer; Eteriske oljer; Duftoljer; Trakter; Røkelsespinner/blanke kjerner; Etiketter; Former; Pipetter/dråpetellere; Hellekanne/smeltekanne; Harpiks/pulver; Duftstrimler/luktestrimler; Røreverktøy/spatel; Termometer; Vokssmelter/varmebeholder; Senteringsverktøy for veke; Vekeklistremerker/lim; Veker; Annet
ro-RO: Conținutul trusei de instrumente pentru artele olfactive: Sticle/flacoane; Cântar digital; Vopsele/coloranți; Uleiuri esențiale; Uleiuri parfumate; Pâlnii; Bețișoare parfumate/miezuri brute; Etichete; Matrițe; Pipete/picurătoare; Vas de turnare/topire; Rășini/pudre; Testere de parfum/blottere; Ustensilă de amestecare/spatulă; Termometru; Topitor de ceară/vas de încălzire; Ustensile pentru centrarea fitilului; Autocolante/adezivi pentru fitil; Fitiluri; Altele
ko: 후각 예술 도구 콘텐츠 키트 구성품: 병/플라콘; 디지털 저울; 염료/착색제; 에센셜 오일; 프래그런스 오일; 깔때기; 인센스 스틱/빈 코어; 레이블; 몰드; 피펫/스포이트; 푸어링 포트/멜팅 피처; 레진/파우더; 시향지/블로터; 젓기 도구/스패출러; 온도계; 왁스 멜터/히팅 포트; 심지 센터링 도구; 심지 스티커/접착제; 심지; 기타
da: Indhold i værktøjssæt til olfaktorisk kunst: Flasker/flakoner; Digitalvægt; Farvestoffer/pigmenter; Æteriske olier; Duftolier; Tragte; Røgelsespinde/kerner uden duft; Labels; Forme; Pipetter/dråbetællere; Hældekande/smeltekande; Harpiks/pulver; Duftstrimler/testpapir; Røreværktøj/spatel; Termometer; Vokssmelter/varmegryde; Værktøjer til centrering af væger; Vægeklistermærker/lim; Væger; Andet
hu: Illatművészeti eszközkészlet tartalma: Üvegek/flakonok; Digitális mérleg; Festékek/színezékek; Illóolajok; Illatolajok; Tölcsérek; Füstölőpálcikák/üres magok; Címkék; Öntőformák; Pipetták/cseppentők; Kiöntőedény/olvasztótégely; Gyanták/porok; Illatcsíkok/tesztcsíkok; Keverőeszköz/spatula; Hőmérő; Viaszolvasztó/melegítőedény; Kanócközpontosító eszközök; Kanócragasztók/matricák; Kanócok; Egyéb
fr: Contenu du kit d’arts olfactifs: Bouteilles/flacons; Balance numérique; Teintures/colorants; Huiles essentielles; Huiles parfumées; Entonnoirs; Bâtonnets d’encens/supports vierges; Étiquettes; Moules; Pipettes/compte-gouttes; Pot verseur/pichet de fonte; Résines/poudres; Touches à sentir/mouillettes; Agitateur/spatule; Thermomètre; Fondeur de cire/pot chauffant; Outils de centrage de mèche; Autocollants pour mèches/adhésifs; Mèches; Autre
th: เนื้อหาชุดเครื่องมือศิลปะการดมกลิ่น: ขวด/ขวดแก้ว; เครื่องชั่งดิจิทัล; สีย้อม/สารให้สี; น้ำมันหอมระเหย; น้ำมันหอม; กรวย; ก้านธูป/แกนเปล่า; ป้ายกำกับ; แม่พิมพ์; ปิเปต/หลอดหยด; หม้อเท/เหยือกหลอม; เรซิน/ผง; แถบดมกลิ่น/กระดาษซับ; เครื่องมือคน/ไม้พาย; เทอร์โมมิเตอร์; เครื่องหลอมแว็กซ์/หม้อต้ม; เครื่องมือจัดกึ่งกลางไส้เทียน; สติกเกอร์ติดไส้เทียน/กาว; ไส้เทียน; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Kit de ferramentas para artes olfativas conteúdo: Frascos/vidros; Balança digital; Corantes; Óleos essenciais; Óleos de fragrância; Funis; Varetas de incenso/hastes neutras; Etiquetas; Moldes; Pipetas/conta-gotas; Jarra de fundição/derretimento; Resinas/pós; Fitas olfativas/papéis absorventes; Agitador/espátula; Termômetro; Derretedor de cera/panela de aquecimento; Centralizadores de pavio; Adesivos/etiquetas para pavio; Pavios; Outros
bg-BG: Съдържание на комплекта инструменти за обонятелни изкуства: Бутилки/флакони; Цифрова везна; Бои/оцветители; Етерични масла; Ароматни масла; Фунии; Ароматни пръчици/основи; Етикети; Форми; Пипети/капкомери; Съд за наливане/топене; Смоли/прахове; Ароматни ленти/блотери; Инструмент за бъркане/шпатула; Термометър; Уред за топене на восък/нагряващ съд; Инструменти за центриране на фитил; Стикери/лепила за фитил; Фитили; Друго
it: Contenuto del kit di strumenti per arti olfattive: Bottiglie/flaconi; Bilancia digitale; Tinte/coloranti; Oli essenziali; Oli profumati; Imbuti; Bastoncini di incenso/anime neutre; Etichette; Stampi; Pipette/contagocce; Bricco per versare/caraffa per sciogliere; Resine/polveri; Strisce profumate/mouillette; Strumento per mescolare/spatola; Termometro; Scioglicera/pentola riscaldante; Strumenti per centrare lo stoppino; Adesivi per stoppini; Stoppini; Altro
zh-CN: 嗅觉艺术工具套装内容: 瓶子/小香水瓶; 电子秤; 染料/着色剂; 精油; 香精油; 漏斗; 线香/香芯; 标签; 模具; 移液器/滴管; 倾倒锅/熔化罐; 树脂/粉末; 闻香条/试香纸; 搅拌工具/刮刀; 温度计; 融蜡器/加热锅; 烛芯居中工具; 烛芯贴/粘合剂; 烛芯; 其他
tr: Koku sanatları alet kiti içeriği: Şişeler/flakonlar; Dijital terazi; Boyalar/renklendiriciler; Uçucu yağlar; Esans yağları; Huniler; Tütsü çubukları/boş çekirdekler; Etiketler; Kalıplar; Pipetler/damlalıklar; Dökme kabı/eritme sürahisi; Reçineler/tozlar; Koku şeritleri/kurutma kağıtları; Karıştırma aleti/spatula; Termometre; Vaks eritici/ısıtma kabı; Fitil ortalama aletleri; Fitil çıkartmaları/yapıştırıcıları; Fitiller; Diğer
fi: Tuoksutyökalupakin sisältö: Pullot/flakonit; Digitaalinen vaaka; Väriaineet; Eteeriset öljyt; Tuoksuöljyt; Suppilot; Suitsuketikut/tyhjät ytimet; Etiketit; Muotit; Pipetit/tiputtimet; Kaatokannu/sulatuskannu; Hartsit/jauheet; Tuoksuliuskat/testipaperit; Sekoitustyökalu/lasta; Lämpömittari; Vahansulattaja/kuumennusastia; Sydänlangan keskitystyökalut; Sydänlangan tarrat/liimat; Sydänlangat; Muu
sl-SI: Vsebina kompleta orodij za dišavno umetnost: Stekleničke/flakoni; Digitalna tehtnica; Barvila; Eterična olja; Dišavna olja; Lijaki; Kadilne palčke/prazna jedra; Etikete; Kalupi; Pipete/kapalke; Posoda za vlivanje/taljenje; Smole/praški; Pivniki za testiranje dišav; Pripomoček za mešanje/lopatica; Termometer; Talilnik voska/grelna posoda; Orodja za centriranje stenja; Nalepke/lepila za stenj; Stenji; Drugo
sv: Innehåll i doftkonstsats: Flaskor/flakonger; Digitalvåg; Färgämnen/färg; Eteriska oljor; Doftoljor; Trattar; Rökelsepinnar/kärnor; Etiketter; Formar; Pipetter/dropprör; Hällkanna/smältkanna; Hartser/pulver; Doftstickor/doftremsor; Omrörningsverktyg/spatel; Termometer; Vaxsmältare/värmegryta; Verktyg för att centrera vekar; Vekklistermärken/lim; Vekar; Övrigt
ru: Содержимое набора инструментов для ольфакторного искусства: Бутылочки/флаконы; Цифровые весы; Красители/пигменты; Эфирные масла; Ароматические масла; Воронки; Ароматические палочки/основы; Этикетки; Формы; Пипетки/капельницы; Ковш для заливки/плавления; Смолы/порошки; Тестерные полоски/блоттеры; Инструмент для смешивания/шпатель; Термометр; Воскоплав/емкость для нагрева; Инструменты для центрирования фитиля; Наклейки для фитилей/клей; Фитили; Другое
vi: Nội dung bộ công cụ nghệ thuật khứu giác: Chai/lọ; Cân điện tử; Thuốc nhuộm/chất tạo màu; Tinh dầu; Dầu thơm; Phễu; Que hương/lõi trống; Nhãn; Khuôn; Ống hút/ống nhỏ giọt; Bình rót/ca nấu chảy; Nhựa resin/bột; Giấy thử mùi/giấy thấm; Dụng cụ khuấy/thìa phết; Nhiệt kế; Nồi nấu sáp/nồi đun; Dụng cụ căn giữa bấc; Miếng dán bấc/keo dán; Bấc; Khác
el: Περιεχόμενο κιτ εργαλείων οσφρητικών τεχνών: Μπουκάλια/φιαλίδια; Ψηφιακή ζυγαριά; Βαφές/χρωστικές; Αιθέρια έλαια; Αρωματικά έλαια; Χωνιά; Στικ θυμιάματος/κενοί πυρήνες; Ετικέτες; Καλούπια; Πιπέτες/σταγονόμετρα; Δοχείο χύτευσης/κανάτα τήξης; Ρητίνες/σκόνες; Ταινίες αρώματος/δοκιμαστικά χαρτάκια; Εργαλείο ανάδευσης/σπάτουλα; Θερμόμετρο; Συσκευή τήξης κεριού/δοχείο θέρμανσης; Εργαλεία κεντραρίσματος φιτιλιού; Αυτοκόλλητα φιτιλιού/κόλλες; Φιτίλια; Άλλο
nl: Geurkunst gereedschapskit inhoud: Flessen/flacons; Digitale weegschaal; Kleurstoffen; Essentiële oliën; Geuroliën; Trechters; Wierookstokjes/blanco kernen; Labels; Mallen; Pipetten/druppelaars; Gietpot/smeltkroes; Harsen/poeders; Geurstrookjes/vloeipapiertjes; Roerstaafje/spatel; Thermometer; Wassmelter/verwarmingspot; Lontcentreerders; Lontstickers/lijm; Lonten; Overige
sk-SK: Obsah súpravy pomôcok pre olfaktorické umenie: Fľaštičky/flakóny; Digitálna váha; Farbivá/farby; Esenciálne oleje; Vonné oleje; Lieviky; Vonné tyčinky/základy bez vône; Štítky; Formy; Pipety/kvapkadlá; Lieviková nádoba/taviaca nádoba; Živice/prášky; Vonné prúžky/papieriky; Miešadlo/špachtľa; Teplomer; Tavička vosku/ohrievacia nádoba; Nástroje na centrovanie knôtu; Nálepky/lepidlá na knôt; Knôty; Iné
pl: Zestaw narzędzi do sztuki węchowej Treść: Butelki/flakony; Waga cyfrowa; Barwniki/pigmenty; Olejki eteryczne; Olejki zapachowe; Lejki; Kadzidełka/rdzenie kadzideł; Etykiety; Formy; Pipety/kroplomierze; Dzbanek do nalewania/topienia; Żywice/proszki; Paski zapachowe/blotery; Mieszadło/szpatułka; Termometr; Topielnik do wosku/podgrzewacz; Narzędzia do centrowania knota; Naklejki/kleje do knotów; Knoty; Inne
lt-LT: Uoslės meno įrankių rinkinio turinys: Buteliukai / flakonai; Skaitmeninės svarstyklės; Dažikliai / pigmentai; Eteriniai aliejai; Kvapieji aliejai; Piltuvėliai; Smilkalų lazdelės / tušti pagrindai; Etiketės; Formos; Pipetės / lašintuvai; Lydymo / piltuvinis indas; Dervos / milteliai; Kvapų juostelės; Maišymo įrankis / mentelė; Termometras; Vaško lydymo / kaitinimo indas; Knato centravimo įrankiai; Knato lipdukai / klijai; Knatai; Kita
ja: 嗅覚ツールキットコンテンツ: ボトル/小瓶; デジタルスケール; 染料/着色剤; エッセンシャルオイル; フレグランスオイル; 漏斗; 線香/ブランクコア; ラベル; 型 (モールド); ピペット/スポイト; 注ぎポット/メルティングピッチャー; 樹脂/パウダー; 試香紙/ムエット; 攪拌ツール/スパチュラ; 温度計; ワックスメルター/ヒーティングポット; 芯固定ツール; 芯用シール/接着剤; 芯; その他